New York, session 2025-2026, S7770.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph f of subdivision 1 of section 13-0339-a of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 298 of the laws of 3 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 f. alewife (Alosa pseudoharengus) until December thirty-first, two 5 thousand [twenty-five] twenty-eight, 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09963-01-5